Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 2. Custody and Visitation
District court's decision amending order relative to custody of children will not be disturbed on appeal, in absence of abuse of discretion or violation of some legal principle. Stirrett v. Stirrett, 35 Wyo. 206, 248 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1926).

An appellate court will not interfere with the trial court's decision regarding modification of custody absent a procedural error or a clear abuse of discretion. Semler v. Semler, 924 P.2d 422,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1996).

No abuse of discretion

where court awarded custody of parties' two minor children to father. — See Trudeau v. Trudeau, 822 P.2d 873,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1991).

Court did not abuse discretion by refusing to award custody of parties' daughter to father. See Pinther v. Pinther, 888 P.2d 1250,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1995).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in awarding physical custody of the children to the mother with visitation for the father because the parents' failure to cooperate and communicate precluded a shared custody arrangement. Stevens v. Stevens, 2014 WY 23, 318 P.3d 802,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2014).

Guardian ad litem recommendation.—

District court explained in detail its reasoning in rejecting the recommendation of the guardian ad litem because of the parties' lack of cooperation, and there was no abuse of discretion. JR v. TLW, 2016 WY 45, 371 P.3d 570,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2016).

Shared custody issues. —

The court's determination that the children were “comfortable” in both homes did not sufficiently address the disruption which unavoidably results from moving the children's primary residence four times during the school year. Reavis v. Reavis, 955 P.2d 428,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

District court erred by failing to ensure that the children's best interests were protected when it ordered shared custody pursuant to a settlement agreement in a divorce proceeding without having all of the facts necessary to evaluate the impact that shared custody might have on the children.
Eickbush v. Eickbush, 2007 WY 179, 171 P.3d 509,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 2007), overruled in part, Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

District court erred by ordering shared custody where it did not serve the best interest of the child, as the arrangement would require the child to spend at least three hours every fourth day traveling on highways, sometimes in extreme winter weather conditions, would require him to attend two different day cares during the course of every week, and would separate him from his primary caregiver; district court's finding that both parties were “good parents” was insufficient to support the shared custody arrangement, as the parents did not live in close proximity, and they had no history of effective communication or cooperative decision making.
Buttle v. Buttle, 2008 WY 135, 196 P.3d 174,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2008), overruled in part, Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

District court disregarded or failed to consider the factors in ordering shared custody, and the stated reasons were not a sufficient basis to order shared custody; the parties had significantly different philosophies regarding the developmental services the child would receive and shared custody did not provide the framework that best served the child. Williams v. Williams, 2016 WY 21, 368 P.3d 539,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2016).

In Wyoming, the fundamental consideration in determining child custody should be the best interests of the children. Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-201(a) (2017). The Supreme Court of Wyoming holds there is no presumption that shared custody is contrary to the best interests of the children and shared custody should be considered on an equal footing with other forms of custody. Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

District court’s determination that shared custody was in the child’s best interests was affirmed where the district court considered the child’s developmental needs, and the record was replete with instances of the parties’ cooperating and sharing time with the child. Bruegman v. Bruegman, 2018 WY 49, 417 P.3d 157,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2018).

No material change in circumstances. —

Since Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c) required a 2 step approach to a child custody modification: (1) a material change in circumstances; and then (2) a best interest of the child analysis, district court properly denied a father's motion for modification without further consideration once it had found there had been no material change in circumstances. CLH v. MMJ (In re TLJ), 2006 WY 28, 129 P.3d 874,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2006).

No finding on domestic violence allegation. —

It was necessary to remand a child custody case for further proceedings because as to the mother's allegation that the father physically abused her in one incident of domestic violence, the trial court did not make any note as to whether it considered the evidence under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-201(c), let alone the weight it carried in the final decision.
In re Paternity, JWH v. DAH, 2011 WY 66, 252 P.3d 942,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Apr. 14, 2011).

No abuse of discretion in declining to modify child custody. —

District court did not abuse the court’s discretion when it declined to modify a child custody arrangement—even though the court found a material change in circumstances had occurred in that the father and the mother agreed that the custody arrangement was not working—because the court concluded that it was in the child’s best interest to leave the existing joint custody order in place as the child was bright and did well in school and extracurriculars, had close relationships with both parents, and enjoyed spending time at both homes. Lackey v. Lackey, 2022 WY 22, 503 P.3d 92,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2022).

Applied

in

Fergusson v. Fergusson, 2002 WY 66, 45 P.3d 641,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

GGV v. JLR, 2002 WY 19, 39 P.3d 1066,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2002); Beeman v. Beeman, 2005 WY 45, 109 P.3d 548,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(2005); Hayzlett v. Hayzlett, 2007 WY 147, 167 P.3d 639,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Sept. 18, 2007).

Cited

in

RS v. Dept. of Family Servs. (In re KLS), 2004 WY 87, 94 P.3d 1025,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(2004); Parris v. Parris, 2009 WY 44, 204 P.3d 298,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Mar. 30, 2009); ELA v. AAB, 2016 WY 98, 382 P.3d 45,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2016).

Law reviews. —

See “The Problem of Parental Kidnapping,” 10 Wyo. L.J. 225.

For comment, “Child Custody Arrangements: Say What You Mean, Mean What You Say,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1996).

For comment, “Protecting Our Children in Custody Cases: The Wyoming Legislature Should Create an Attorney/Guardian Ad Litem Who Represents the Best Interests of the Child and Can Give the Child the Benefit of Limited Confidentiality,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 427 (1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurisdiction to award custody of child having legal domicil in another state, 4 ALR2d 7.

Jurisdiction of court to award custody of child domiciled in state but physically outside of it, 9 ALR2d 434.

Nonresidence as affecting one's right to custody of child, 15 ALR2d 432.

Consideration of investigation by welfare agency or the like in making award as between parents of custody of children, 35 ALR2d 629.

Consent of natural parents as essential to adoption where parents are divorced, 47 ALR2d 824.

Marriage of minor child as terminating provisions in divorce or similar decree, 58 ALR2d 355.

Court's power as to support and maintenance of children in marriage annulment proceedings, 63 ALR2d 1029.

Mental health of contesting parent as factor in award of child custody, 74 ALR2d 1073.

“Split,” “divided,” or “alternate” custody of children, 92 ALR2d 695.

Propriety of separating children by awarding custody to different parents, 98 ALR2d 926.

Propriety of court conducting private interview with child in determining custody, 99 ALR2d 954.

Child's wishes as factor in awarding custody, 4 ALR3d 1396.

Power of court which denies divorce or legal separation to award custody or make provision for support of child, 7 ALR3d 1096.

Award of custody of child to parent against whom divorce is decreed, 23 ALR3d 6.

Extraterritorial effect of valid award of custody of child of divorced parents, in absence of substantial change in circumstances, 35 ALR3d 520.

Right, in child custody proceedings, to cross-examine investigating officer whose report is used by court in its decision, 59 ALR3d 1337.

Modern status of maternal preference rule or presumption in child custody cases, 70 ALR3d 262.

Effect, in subsequent proceedings, of paternity findings or implications in divorce or annulment decree or in support or custody order made incidental thereto, 78 ALR3d 846.

Right to require psychiatric or mental examination for party seeking to obtain or retain custody of child, 99 ALR3d 268.

Admissibility of social worker's expert testimony on child custody issues, 1 ALR4th 837.

Parent's physical disability or handicap as factor in custody award or proceedings, 3 ALR4th 1044.

Necessity of requiring presence in court of both parties in proceedings relating to custody or visitation of children, 15 ALR4th 864.

Propriety of awarding custody of child to parent residing or intending to reside in foreign country, 20 ALR4th 677.

Effect of remarriage of spouses to each other on child custody and support provisions of prior divorce decree, 26 ALR4th 325.

Court-authorized permanent or temporary removal of child by parent to foreign country, 30 ALR4th 548.

Right of parent to regain custody of child after temporary conditional relinquishment of custody, 35 ALR4th 61.

Propriety of provision of custody or visitation order designed to insulate child from parent's extramarital sexual relationships, 40 ALR4th 812.

Primary caretaker role of respective parents as factor in awarding custody of child, 41 ALR4th 1129.

Parent's transsexuality as factor in award of custody of children, visitation rights or termination of parental rights, 59 ALR4th 1170.

Mother's status as “working mother” as factor in awarding child custody, 62 ALR4th 259.

Child custody: separating children by custody awards to different parents — post-1975 cases, 67 ALR4th 354.

Child custody and visitation rights of person infected with AIDS, 86 ALR4th 211.

Denial or restriction of visitation rights to parent charged with sexually abusing child, 1 ALR5th 776.

Continuity of residence as factor in contest between parent and nonparent for custody of child who has been residing with nonparent—modern status, 15 ALR5th 692.

Parent's use of drugs as factor in award of custody of children, visitation rights, or termination of parental rights, 20 ALR5th 534.

Smoking as factor in child custody and visitation cases, 36 ALR5th 377.

Rights and remedies of parents inter se with respect to the names of their children, 40 ALR5th 697.

Construction and effect of statutes mandating consideration of, or creating presumptions regarding, domestic violence in awarding custody of children, 51 ALR5th 241.

Mental health of contesting parent as factor in award of child custody, 53 ALR5th 375.

Initial award or denial of child custody to homosexual or lesbian parent, 62 ALR5th 591.

Custodial parent's homosexual or lesbian relationship with third person as justifying modification of child custody order, 65 ALR5th 591.

Admissibility of expert testimony regarding questions of domestic law, 66 ALR5th 135.

Child custody and visitation rights arising from same-sex relationship, 80 ALR5th 1.

Religion as factor in child custody cases, 124 ALR 5th 203.

Parents'
work schedules and associated dependent care issues as factors in child custody determinations. 26 A.L.R.6th 331.

Effect of parent's military service upon child custody. 21 A.L.R.6th 577.